Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 23.
APPORTIONMENT (CONST., ART. 8 AMENDED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment rewrote Ark. Const., Art. 8, and is incorporated therein. The amendment was adopted at the general election held on Nov. 3, 1936, and was declared adopted by Speaker of the House of Representatives on Jan. 12, 1937.

Ark. Const., Art. 8, as amended by this amendment, was subsequently amended by Const. Amend. 45. See notes to Ark. Const., Art. 8.